src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-rooda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rōda: # Noun 38 'eng /est raud/fin' - full paradigm
     rōda+N+Sg+Nom: rōda
     rōda+N+Sg+Gen: rōda
     rōda+N+Sg+Par: roudõ
     rōda+N+Sg+Dat: rōdan
     rōda+N+Sg+Ins: rōdaks
     rōda+N+Sg+Ill: roudõ
     rōda+N+Sg+Ela: rōdast
     rōda+N+Pl+Nom: rōdad
     rōda+N+Pl+Gen: rōdad
     rōda+N+Pl+Par: rouḑi
     rōda+N+Pl+Dat: rōdadõn
     rōda+N+Pl+Ins: rōdadõks
     rōda+N+Pl+Ill: rōdiž
     rōda+N+Pl+Ela: rōdist
